Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1414.03
Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center; cost of planning and construction; limitations.

The cost of planning and construction of the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center, excluding interest on indebtedness of such building and facilities, shall not exceed three million six hundred seventy-five thousand dollars plus the amount of investment income received by the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center Fund and by any of the bond or reserve funds established in connection with the city of Grand Island bond issue used to finance such building and facilities.

Laws 1978, LB 877, § 3.